Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4113.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-2402, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-2402. Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts; funds A. Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts are established to provide options for the education of students in this state. B. To enroll a qualified student for an Arizona empowerment scholarship account, the parent of the qualified student must sign an agreement to do all of the following: 1. Use a portion of the Arizona empowerment scholarship account monies allocated annually to provide an education for the qualified student in at least the subjects of reading, grammar, mathematics, social studies and science, unless the Arizona empowerment scholarship account is allocated monies according to a transfer schedule other than quarterly transfers pursuant to section 15-2403, subsection G. 2. Not enroll the qualified student in a school district or charter school and release the school district from all obligations to educate the qualified student.  This paragraph does not: (a) Relieve the school district or charter school that the qualified student previously attended from the obligation to conduct an evaluation pursuant to section 15-766. (b) Require the qualified student to withdraw from a  any school district or charter school before enrolling for an Arizona empowerment scholarship account if the qualified student withdraws from the school district or charter school before receiving any monies in the qualified student's Arizona empowerment scholarship account. (c) Prevent the qualified student from applying in advance for an Arizona empowerment scholarship account to be funded beginning the following school year, subject to section 15-2403, subsection H. 3. Not accept a scholarship from a school tuition organization pursuant to title 43 concurrently with an Arizona empowerment scholarship account for the qualified student in the same year a parent signs the agreement pursuant to this section. 4. Use monies deposited in the qualified student's Arizona empowerment scholarship account only for the following expenses of the qualified student: (a) Tuition or fees at a qualified school that requires all teaching staff and school personnel who have unsupervised contact with students to be fingerprinted. (b) Textbooks required by a qualified school. (c) If the qualified student meets any of the criteria specified in section 15-2401, paragraph 7, subdivision (a), item (i), (ii) or (iii) as determined by a school district or by an independent third party pursuant to section 15-2403, subsection J, the qualified student may use the following additional services: (i) Educational therapies from a licensed or accredited practitioner or provider, including and up to any amount not covered by insurance if the expense is partially paid by a health insurance policy for the qualified student. (ii) A licensed or accredited paraprofessional or educational aide. (iii) Tuition for vocational and life skills education approved by the department. (iv) Associated goods and services that include educational and psychological evaluations, assistive technology rentals and braille translation goods and services approved by the department. (d) Tutoring or teaching services provided by an individual who is not subject to disciplinary action by the state board of education for immoral or unprofessional conduct pursuant to section 15-505 or 15-534.04 or a facility that is accredited by a state, regional or national accrediting organization. The department shall ensure that any individual who provides tutoring or teaching services to one or more qualified students pursuant to this subdivision is not subject to disciplinary action by the state board of education.  The department shall also remove any individual who is subject to disciplinary action by the state board of education from all platforms that the department provides to parents and qualified students for the purchase of goods or educational services using account monies. (e) Curricula and supplementary materials. (f) Tuition or fees for a nonpublic online learning program. (g) Fees for a nationally standardized norm-referenced achievement test, an advanced placement examination or any exams related to college or university admission. (h) Tuition or fees at an eligible postsecondary institution. (i) Textbooks required by an eligible postsecondary institution. (j) Fees to manage the Arizona empowerment scholarship account. (k) Services provided by a public school, including individual classes and extracurricular programs. (l) Insurance or surety bond payments. (m) Uniforms purchased from or through a qualified school. (n) If the qualified student meets the criteria specified in section 15-2401, paragraph 7, subdivision (a), item (i), (ii) or (iii) and if the qualified student is in the second year prior to the final year of a contract executed pursuant to this article, costs associated with an annual education plan conducted by an independent evaluation team. The department shall prescribe minimum qualifications for independent evaluation teams pursuant to this subdivision and factors that teams must use to determine whether the qualified student shall be eligible to continue to receive monies pursuant to this article through the school year in which the qualified student reaches twenty-two years of age. An independent evaluation team that provides an annual education plan pursuant to this subdivision shall submit a written report that summarizes the results of the evaluation to the parent of the qualified student and to the department on or before July 31. The written report submitted by the independent evaluation team is valid for one year. If the department determines that the qualified student meets the eligibility criteria prescribed in the annual education plan, the qualified student is eligible to continue to receive monies pursuant to this article until the qualified student reaches twenty-two years of age, subject to annual review. A parent may appeal the department's decision pursuant to title 41, chapter 6, article 10. As an addendum to a qualified student's final-year contract, the department shall provide the following written information to the parent of the qualified student: (i) That the qualified student will not be eligible to continue to receive monies pursuant to this article unless the results of an annual education plan conducted pursuant to this subdivision demonstrate that the qualified student meets the eligibility criteria prescribed in the annual education plan. (ii) That the parent is entitled to obtain an annual education plan pursuant to this subdivision to determine whether the qualified student meets the eligibility criteria prescribed in the annual education plan. (iii) A list of independent evaluation teams that meet the minimum qualifications prescribed by the department pursuant to this subdivision. (o) Public transportation services in this state, including a commuter pass for the qualified student, or transportation network services as defined in section 28-9551 between the qualified student's residence and a qualified school in which the qualified student is enrolled. (p) Computer hardware and technological devices primarily used for an educational purpose. For the purposes of this subdivision, "computer hardware and technological devices": (i) Includes calculators, personal computers, laptops, tablet devices, microscopes, telescopes and printers. (ii) Does not include entertainment and other primarily noneducational devices, including televisions, telephones, video game consoles and accessories, and home theatre and audio equipment. 5. Not file an affidavit of intent to homeschool pursuant to section 15-802, subsection B, paragraph 2 or 3. 6. Not use monies deposited in the qualified student's account for any of the following: (a) Computer hardware or other technological devices, except as otherwise allowed under paragraph 4, subdivision (c) or (p) of this subsection. (b) Transportation of the pupil, except for transportation services described in paragraph 4, subdivision (o) of this subsection. C. In exchange for the parent's agreement pursuant to subsection B of this section, the department shall transfer from the monies that would otherwise be allocated to a recipient's prior school district, or if the child is currently eligible to attend a preschool program for children with disabilities, a kindergarten program or any of grades one through twelve, the monies that the department determines would otherwise be allocated to a recipient's expected school district of attendance, to the treasurer for deposit into an Arizona empowerment scholarship account an amount that is equivalent to ninety percent of the sum of the base support level and additional assistance prescribed in sections 15-185 and 15-943 for that particular student if that student were attending a charter school. D. The department of education empowerment scholarship account fund is established consisting of monies appropriated by the legislature. The department shall administer the fund. Monies in the fund are subject to legislative appropriation. Monies in the fund shall be used for the department's costs in administering Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts under this chapter. Monies in the fund are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. If the number of Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts significantly increases after fiscal year 2020-2021, the department may request an increase in the amount appropriated to the fund in any subsequent fiscal year in the budget estimate submitted pursuant to section 35-113. The department shall list monies in the fund as a separate line item in its budget estimate. E. The state treasurer empowerment scholarship account fund is established consisting of monies appropriated by the legislature. The state treasurer shall administer the fund.  Monies in the fund shall be used for the state treasurer's costs in administering the Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts under this chapter. If the number of Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts significantly increases after fiscal year 2020-2021, the state treasurer may request an increase in the amount appropriated to the fund in any subsequent fiscal year in the budget estimate submitted pursuant to section 35-113. Monies in the fund are subject to legislative appropriation.  Monies in the fund are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. The state treasurer shall list monies in the fund as a separate line item in its budget estimate. F. A parent must renew the qualified student's Arizona empowerment scholarship account on an annual basis. The department of education shall verify that the parent's child is a qualified student as defined in section 15-2401 or 15-2401.01 in the year for which the parent seeks to renew the Arizona empowerment scholarship account.  This subsection does not require the department to annually verify the child's disability for the purpose of section 15-2401, paragraph 7, subdivision (a), item (i), (ii) or (iii), if applicable. G. Notwithstanding any changes to the student's multidisciplinary evaluation team plan, a student who has previously qualified for an Arizona empowerment scholarship account remains eligible to apply for renewal until the student finishes high school. H. If a parent does not renew the qualified student's Arizona empowerment scholarship account for a period of three academic years, the department shall notify the parent that the qualified student's account will be closed in sixty calendar days. The notification must be sent through by certified mail, email and telephone, if applicable.  The parent has sixty calendar days to renew the qualified student's Arizona empowerment scholarship account. If the parent chooses not to renew or does not respond in within sixty calendar days, the department shall close the account and any remaining monies shall be returned to the this state. I. A signed agreement under this section constitutes school attendance required by section 15-802. J. Notwithstanding section 15-2404, a qualified school or a provider of services that receives monies from an Arizona empowerment scholarship account pursuant to this article is subject to the following requirements: 1. A qualified school or a provider of services purchased pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 4 of this section may not share, refund or rebate any Arizona empowerment scholarship account monies with the parent or qualified student in any manner. 2. A qualified school that receives monies from an Arizona empowerment scholarship account pursuant to this article shall comply with all of the following, consistent with the family educational rights and privacy act of 1974 (p.l. 93-380; 88 stat. 571; 20 United States Code section 1232g): (a) The reporting, follow-up and hearing participation requirements prescribed by section 41-1279.03, subsection a, paragraph 11. (b) The financial reporting required pursuant to section 15-2403, subsection I, paragraph 7. (c) Any request for information from the department or the state board of education for the purpose of the financial transparency portal developed pursuant to section 15-2403, subsection L, paragraph 3. K. Notwithstanding subsection H of this section, on the qualified student's graduation from a postsecondary institution or after any period of four consecutive years after high school graduation in which the student is not enrolled in an eligible postsecondary institution, but not before this time as long as the account holder continues using a portion of account monies for allowable expenses each year and is in good standing, the qualified student's Arizona empowerment scholarship account shall be closed and any remaining monies shall be returned to the state. L. Monies received pursuant to this article do not constitute taxable income to the parent of the qualified student. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 15-2403, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-2403. Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts; administration; appeals; risk-based audits; rules; policy handbook A. The treasurer may contract with private financial management firms to manage Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts. B. The department shall conduct or contract for annual audits of Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts to ensure compliance with section 15-2402, subsection B, paragraph 4. The department shall also conduct or contract for random, quarterly and annual audits of Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts as needed to ensure compliance with section 15-2402, subsection B, paragraph 4. The department, in consultation with the office of the auditor general, shall develop risk-based auditing procedures for audits conducted pursuant to this subsection. C. The department shall annually review a sample of Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts, selected at random, to determine whether the parent or qualified student is in compliance with the terms of the contract, applicable laws, rules and orders relating to the Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts program. The Arizona empowerment scholarship account of a parent or qualified student who is in good standing may be randomly selected pursuant to this subsection only one time during any five-year period. The department may remove any parent or qualified student from eligibility for an Arizona empowerment scholarship account if the parent or qualified student fails to comply with the terms of the contract or applicable laws, rules or orders or knowingly misuses monies or knowingly fails to comply with the terms of the contract with intent to defraud and shall notify the treasurer. The department shall notify the treasurer to suspend the account of a parent or qualified student and shall notify the parent or qualified student in writing that the account has been suspended and that no further transactions will be allowed or disbursements made. The notification shall specify the reason for the suspension and state that the parent or qualified student has fifteen days, not including weekends, to respond and take corrective action. If the parent or qualified student refuses or fails to contact the department, furnish any information or make any report that may be required for reinstatement within the fifteen-day period, the department may remove the parent or qualified student pursuant to this subsection. D. A parent may appeal to the state board of education any administrative decision the department makes pursuant to this article, including determinations of allowable expenses, removal from the program or enrollment eligibility. The department shall notify the parent in writing that the parent may appeal any administrative decision under this article and the process by which the parent may appeal at the same time the department notifies the parent of an administrative decision under this article. The state board of education shall establish an appeals process, and the department shall post this information on the department's website in the same location as the policy handbook developed pursuant to subsection K of this section. E. A parent may represent himself or herself or designate a representative, not necessarily an attorney, before any appeals hearing held pursuant to this section. Any designated representative who is not an attorney admitted to practice may not charge for any services rendered in connection with the hearing. The fact that a representative participated in the hearing or assisted the account holder is not grounds for reversing any administrative decision or order if the evidence supporting the decision or order is substantial, reliable and probative. F. The state board of education may refer cases of substantial misuse of monies to the attorney general for the purpose of collection or for the purpose of a criminal investigation if the state board of education obtains evidence of fraudulent use of an account. G. The department shall make quarterly transfers of the amount calculated pursuant to section 15-2402, subsection C to the treasurer for deposit in the Arizona empowerment scholarship account of each qualified student, except the department may make transfers according to another transfer schedule if the department determines a transfer schedule other than quarterly transfers is necessary to operate the Arizona empowerment scholarship account. H. The department shall accept applications between July 1 and June 30 of each year. The department shall issue an award letter to eligible applicants within thirty days after receipt of a completed application and all required documentation. If an eligible applicant completes an application in advance for an Arizona empowerment scholarship account to be funded beginning on a later date, the department may enroll the eligible applicant on the later date, except that the department may not enroll the applicant more than two fiscal quarters after the fiscal quarter in which the application is completed or on a date that is after March 31 and before July 1. If an eligible applicant completes an application after March 31 and before July 1, the department shall enroll the applicant on or after July 1. The department shall enroll all other eligible applicants when the department issues an award letter pursuant to this subsection. This subsection does not allow a qualified student to receive monies in an Arizona empowerment scholarship account while the qualified student is enrolled in a school district or charter school.  On or before September 1 and November 1 of each year, the department shall furnish to the joint legislative budget committee and the governor's office of strategic planning and budgeting an estimate of the amount required to fund Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts for the following fiscal year. The department shall include in its budget request for the following fiscal year the amount estimated pursuant to section 15-2402, subsection C for each qualified student. I. The state board of education may adopt rules and policies necessary to administer Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts, including rules and policies: 1. For establishing an appeals process pursuant to subsection D of this section. 2. For conducting or contracting for examinations of the use of account monies, consistent with subsection L of this section. 3. For conducting or contracting for random, quarterly and annual reviews of accounts. 4. For establishing or contracting for the establishment of an online anonymous fraud reporting service. 5. For establishing an anonymous telephone hotline for fraud reporting. 6. That require a surety bond or insurance for account holders. 7. Establishing minimum financial performance requirements for qualified schools that accept payment from a parent or qualified student pursuant to this chapter and prescribing financial reporting requirements for each qualified school.  the performance and reporting requirements must do all of the following: (a) Require the same data points that are collected from school districts and charter schools pursuant to annual financial and compliance audits and financial statement audits required under section 15-914. (b) Require any data or information necessary to evaluate all of the following: (i) The qualified school's financial ability to continue operating. (ii) Whether the qualified school is in financial default. (iii) Whether the qualified school's operating costs exceed its available resources. (iv) Whether the qualified school is able to pay debt principal, interest payments and facility costs that become due. (v) The percentage change of the qualified school's student count each year. (c) Summarize the qualified school's financial performance, including whether the qualified school meets the minimum financial performance requirements adopted pursuant to this paragraph. J. The department shall contract with an independent third party for the purposes of determining whether a qualified student is eligible to receive educational therapies or services pursuant to section 15-2402, subsection B, paragraph 4, subdivision (c).  If during any period on or after January 1, 2023 the department fails to ensure that a contract with an independent third party is in effect, during that period: 1. The county school superintendent of each county may approve a list of independent third parties within the county whose evaluation may be used to determine whether a qualified student who resides within the county is eligible to receive educational therapies or services pursuant to section 15-2402, subsection B, paragraph 4, subdivision (c). 2. If the county school superintendent of a county does not provide a list of approved independent third parties within ninety days after the beginning of any period during which the department does not have a contract with an independent third party in effect as described in this subsection, the parent of a qualified student who resides within the county has the right to obtain an independent educational evaluation from a qualified examiner to determine whether the qualified student is eligible to receive educational therapies or services pursuant to section 15-2402, subsection B, paragraph 4, subdivision (c). The expense for an educational evaluation undertaken pursuant to this paragraph shall be provided by the school district within which the qualified student resides and that serves the grade level of the qualified student. For the purposes of this paragraph, "qualified examiner" means a licensed physician, psychiatrist or psychologist. K. On or before July 1 of each year, the department shall develop an applicant and participant handbook that includes and post the handbook on the department's website. The handbook developed pursuant to this subsection shall: 1. Include information relating to policies and processes of Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts. The policy handbook shall 2. include a statement that knowingly obtaining an Arizona empowerment scholarship account for a qualified student by means of false or fraudulent pretenses, representations, promises or material omissions is a violation of section 13-2310 and that a violation of section 13-2310 is a class 2 felony. 3. Comply with the rules adopted by the state board of education pursuant to this section. The department shall post the handbook on the department's website. L. The department shall: 1. Establish and maintain an online database of allowable and disallowed categories of expenses and provide a link to the database on the department's website. 2. Allow the use of account monies to reimburse the parent of a qualified student or a qualified student for the purchase of a good or educational service that is an allowable expense pursuant to section 15-2402, subsection B. 3. develop a financial transparency portal that includes all information reported pursuant to subsection I, paragraph 7 of this section. The department may contract with a third party to develop and maintain the portal. M. Except for cases in which the attorney general determines that a parent or account holder has committed fraud, any expenditure from an Arizona empowerment scholarship account for a purchase that the department determines is not an allowable expense pursuant to section 15-2402 and that is subsequently repaid by the parent or account holder shall be credited back to the Arizona empowerment scholarship account balance within thirty days after the receipt of payment. N. If, in response to an appeal of an administrative decision made by the department, the state board of education issues a stay of an Arizona empowerment scholarship account suspension pursuant to rules adopted by the board, the department may not withhold funding or contract renewal for the account holder because of the appealed administrative decision during the stay unless directed by the board to do so. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Title 15, chapter 19, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-2407, to read: START_STATUTE15-2407. Joint legislative audit committee; committees of reference; program review; reports; auditor general; audit; definitions A. On or before July 1, 2034 and at least every ten years thereafter, the joint legislative audit committee shall conduct a review of the Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts program. The joint legislative audit committee shall direct the appropriate legislative committees of reference established pursuant to section 41-2954 to which the department is assigned to complete a program review of the Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts program at least seventeen months before the deadline for the program review prescribed by this subsection. B. The committees of reference shall undertake the program review in the scope and detail the committees of reference deem appropriate and shall address whether there is a need for the program in this state and, if so, assess the degree to which the original objectives of the program have been achieved expressed in terms of the performance, impact or accomplishments of the program and of the situation the program was intended to address. C. The committees of reference shall complete the draft program review report not later than eleven months before the deadline for the program review prescribed by this section. Before the draft program review report is submitted, the department shall be given an OPPORTUNITY to review, within forty calendar days, the draft program review report and submit written comments or a rebuttal to be included in the preliminary program review report. D. The committees of reference shall submit the preliminary program review report to the governor, to each member of the joint legislative audit committee, to each member of the committees of reference to which the department is assigned and to the department on or before October 1 of the year before the scheduled deadline for the program review prescribed by this section. E. The joint legislative audit committee shall direct the auditor general to conduct a program performance audit to determine one or more of the following: 1. Whether the department is managing the program in an economical and efficient manner. 2. Causes of inefficiencies or uneconomical practices in the program, including inadequacies in management information systems, internal and administrative procedures, organizational structure, use of resources, allocation of personnel, purchasing policies and equipment. 3. Whether the desired results of the program are being achieved. 4. Whether the objectives of the program as established by the legislature are being met. F. The auditor general shall conduct the program performance audit in a manner that is consistent with the performance audit procedures prescribed in title 41, chapter 7, article 10.1 and shall submit the program performance audit to the governor, to each member of the joint legislative audit committee, to the committees of reference to which the department is assigned and to the department on or before October 1 of the year before the scheduled deadline for the program review prescribed by this section. G. After receipt of the program performance audit, the committees of reference shall hold at least one public hearing to receive testimony from the public and from the officials of the department. The committees of reference may hold additional public hearings for the purposes provided in section 41-2954, subsection C as applicable to the program. H. In determining whether to continue or terminate the program, each committee of reference shall consider the information provided in the preliminary program review report and the program performance audit and the factors provided in section 41-2954, subsection D as applicable to the program. I. The joint legislative audit committee may direct the auditor general or the committees of reference to conduct a follow-up review of the program to determine how the department has performed its statutory functions or corrected deficiencies relating to the program before program review, or both. J. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Committee of reference" has the same meaning prescribed in section 41-2952. 2. "Program" means the Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts program. 3. "Program review" means a systematic evaluation by the committees of reference under the supervision of the joint legislative audit committee, with the assistance of the department, joint legislative budget committee, auditor general and support staff, to determine whether the merits of the program justify the program's continuation rather than termination or the program's continuation at a level less than or greater than the existing level. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 41-1279.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1279.03. Powers and duties A. The auditor general shall: 1. Prepare an audit plan for approval by the committee and report to the committee the results of each audit and investigation and other reviews conducted by the auditor general. 2. Conduct or cause to be conducted annual financial and compliance audits of financial transactions and accounts kept by or for all state agencies subject to the federal single audit requirements.  The audits shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and accordingly shall include tests of the accounting records and other auditing procedures as may be considered necessary in the circumstances. The audits shall include the issuance of suitable reports as required by the federal single audit requirements so that the legislature, the federal government and others will be informed as to the adequacy of financial statements of this state in compliance with generally accepted accounting principles and to determine whether this state has complied with laws and regulations that may have a material effect on the financial statements and on major federal assistance programs. 3. Perform procedural reviews for all state agencies at times determined by the auditor general. These reviews may include evaluation of administrative and accounting internal controls and reports on these reviews. 4. Perform special research requests, special audits and related assignments as designated by the committee and conduct performance audits, special audits, special research requests and investigations of any state agency, whether created by the constitution or otherwise, as may be requested by the committee. 5. Annually on or before the fourth Monday of December, prepare a written report to the governor and to the committee that contains a summary of activities for the previous fiscal year. 6. In the fifth year and in each fifth year thereafter in which a transportation excise tax is in effect in a county as provided in section 42-6106 or 42-6107, conduct a performance audit that: (a) Reviews past expenditures and future planned expenditures of the transportation excise revenues and determines the impact of the expenditures in solving transportation problems within the county and, for a transportation excise tax in effect in a county as provided in section 42-6107, determines whether the expenditures of the transportation excise revenues comply with section 28-6392, subsection B. (b) Reviews projects completed to date and projects to be completed during the remaining years in which a transportation excise tax is in effect.  Within six months after each review period, the auditor general shall present a report to the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate detailing findings and making recommendations. (c) Reviews, determines, reports and makes recommendations to the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate whether the distribution of Arizona highway user revenues complies with title 28, chapter 18, article 2. 7. If requested by the committee, conduct performance audits of counties and incorporated cities and towns receiving Arizona highway user revenue fund monies pursuant to title 28, chapter 18, article 2 to determine whether the monies are being spent as provided in section 28-6533, subsection B. 8. Perform special audits designated pursuant to law if the auditor general determines that there are adequate monies appropriated for the auditor general to complete the audit. If the auditor general determines the appropriated monies are inadequate, the auditor general shall notify the joint legislative audit committee. Based on information provided by the auditor general, for any legislative measure that requires the auditor general to perform a special audit, the joint legislative budget committee staff shall notify all the members of the legislature as soon as practicable of the cost to conduct the special audit. 9. Establish a schoolwide audit team in the office of the auditor general to conduct performance audits and monitor school districts to determine the percentage of every dollar spent in the classroom by the school district. Each school district shall prominently post on its website home page a copy of its profile pages that displays the percentage of every dollar spent in the classroom by that school district from the most recent status report issued by the auditor general pursuant to this paragraph. The auditor general shall determine, through random selection, the school districts to be audited each year, subject to review by the joint legislative audit committee. A school district that is subject to an audit pursuant to this paragraph shall notify the auditor general in writing whether the school district agrees or disagrees with the findings of the audit and whether the school district will implement the recommendations, implement modifications to the recommendations or refuse to implement the recommendations. The school district shall submit to the auditor general a written status report on the implementation of the audit recommendations at the request of the auditor general, within the two-year period following the issuance of an audit conducted pursuant to this paragraph. The auditor general shall review the school district's progress toward implementing the recommendations of the audit and provide status reports of the reviews to the joint legislative audit committee during this two-year period. The auditor general may review a school district's progress beyond this two-year period for recommendations that have not yet been implemented by the school district.  The school district shall participate in any hearing scheduled during this review period by the joint legislative audit committee or by any other legislative committee designated by the joint legislative audit committee. 10. Annually review per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses for employees of this state and members of a state board, commission, council or advisory committee by judgmentally selecting samples and evaluating the propriety of per diem compensation and expense reimbursements. 11. Establish an audit team in the office of the auditor general to conduct audits and monitor qualified schools to determine the percentage of Arizona empowerment scholarship account monies that are spent in the classroom by the qualified school. Notwithstanding any other law, a qualified school that accepts a payment from a parent or qualified student pursuant to title 15, chapter 19 shall prominently post on the qualified school's website home page a copy of the qualified school's profile pages that displays the percentage of Arizona empowerment scholarship account monies spent in the classroom by that qualified school from the most recent status report issued by the auditor general pursuant to this paragraph. The auditor general shall determine, through random selection, the qualified schools to be audited each year, subject to review by the joint legislative audit committee.  A qualified school that is subject to an audit pursuant to this paragraph shall notify the auditor general in writing whether the qualified school agrees or disagrees with the findings and recommendations of the audit and whether the qualified school will implement the findings and recommendations, implement modifications to the findings and recommendations or refuse to implement the findings and recommendations.  The qualified school shall submit to the auditor general a written status report on the implementation of the audit findings and recommendations every six months for two years after the completion of an audit conducted pursuant to this paragraph. The auditor general shall review the qualified school's progress toward implementing the findings and recommendations of the audit every six months after receiving the qualified school's status report for two years. The auditor general may review a qualified school's progress beyond this two-year period for recommendations that have not yet been implemented by the qualified school. The auditor general shall provide a status report of these reviews to the joint legislative audit committee. The qualified school shall participate in any hearing scheduled during this review period by the joint legislative audit committee or by any other legislative committee designated by the joint legislative audit committee.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "qualified school" has the same meaning prescribed in section 15-2401. B. The auditor general may: 1. Subject to approval by the committee, adopt rules necessary to administer the duties of the office. 2. Hire consultants to conduct the studies required by subsection A, paragraphs 6 and 7 of this section. C. If approved by the committee, the auditor general may charge a reasonable fee for the cost of performing audits or providing accounting services for auditing federal funds, special audits or special services requested by political subdivisions of this state. Monies collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the audit services revolving fund. D. The department of transportation, the county treasurer, the county transportation excise tax recipients, and the board of supervisors of a county that has approved a county transportation excise tax as provided in section 42-6106 or 42-6107 and the governing bodies of counties, cities and towns receiving Arizona highway user revenue fund monies shall cooperate with and provide necessary information to the auditor general or the auditor general's consultant. E. The department of transportation or the county transportation excise tax recipients shall reimburse the auditor general as follows, and the auditor general shall deposit the reimbursed monies in the audit services revolving fund: 1. For the cost of conducting the studies or hiring a consultant to conduct the studies required by subsection A, paragraph 6, subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section, from monies collected pursuant to a county transportation excise tax levied pursuant to section 42-6106 or 42-6107. 2. For the cost of conducting the studies or hiring a consultant pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 6, subdivision (c) and paragraph 7 of this section, from the Arizona highway user revenue fund. END_STATUTE